Nebraska, session 109, LB553.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-5662, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5662 (1) To be eligible for a student loan under the Rural Health
Systems and Professional Incentive Act, an applicant or a recipient shall
be enrolled or accepted for enrollment in any of the following an
accredited programs in Nebraska:
(a) Medical medical or dental education program;
(b) Physician or physician assistant education program;
(c) Dietitian nutritionist program; or
(d) Approved an approved mental health practice program in Nebraska.
(2) To be eligible for the medical resident incentive under the act,
an applicant or a recipient shall be enrolled or accepted for enrollment
in an approved medical specialty residency program in Nebraska.
(3) To be eligible for loan repayment under the act, an applicant or
a recipient shall:
(a) Be one of the following: be
(i) A a pharmacist; ,
(ii) A a dentist; ,
(iii) A a physical therapist; ,
(iv) An an occupational therapist; ,
(v) A a mental health practitioner; ,
(vi) A a psychologist licensed under the requirements of section
38-3114 or the equivalent thereof; ,
(vii) A a nurse practitioner; ,
(viii) A a physician assistant; ,
(ix) A dietitian nutritionist licensed under section 38-1813;
(x) A a psychiatrist; , or
(xi) A a physician in an approved specialty; and
(b) Be shall be licensed to practice in Nebraska; ,
(c) Not not be enrolled in a residency program; ,
(d) Not not be practicing under a provisional or temporary
-2-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
license; , and
(e) Enter enter practice in a designated health profession shortage
area in Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Section 71-5663, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5663 (1) The amount of financial assistance provided through
student loans pursuant to the Rural Health Systems and Professional
Incentive Act shall be limited to thirty thousand dollars for each
recipient for each academic year and, except as provided in subdivision
(4)(a) of this section, shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per medical, dental, or doctorate-level mental health student or
thirty thousand dollars per master's level mental health or physician
assistant student.
(2) The amount of financial assistance provided through the medical
resident incentive program pursuant to the act shall be limited to forty
thousand dollars for each recipient for each year of residency and,
except as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, shall not
exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars.
(3) The amount of financial assistance provided by the state through
loan repayments pursuant to the act (a) for physicians, psychiatrists,
dentists, and psychologists shall be limited to thirty thousand dollars
per recipient per year of full-time practice in a designated health
profession shortage area and, except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of
this section, shall not exceed ninety thousand dollars per recipient and
(b) for physician assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, physical
therapists, occupational therapists, dietitian nutritionists, and mental
health practitioners shall be limited to fifteen thousand dollars per
recipient per year of full-time practice in a designated health
profession shortage area and, except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of
this section, shall not exceed forty-five thousand dollars per recipient.
(4)(a) The total amount of financial assistance provided through
-3-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
student loans for a doctorate-level mental health student or master's
level mental health student shall be the full amount of such loans for a
person who practices psychiatry, psychology, or mental health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(b) The total amount of financial assistance provided through the
medical resident incentive program for a psychiatrist shall be the full
amount of such psychiatrist's qualified educational debts if such person
practices psychiatry:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(c) The total amount of financial assistance provided through loan
repayments pursuant to the act for psychiatrists, psychologists, and
mental health practitioners shall be the full amount of such person's
qualified educational debts if such person practices psychiatry,
psychology, or mental health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(5) For purposes of this section, community supervision population
means persons on probation, post-release supervision, and pretrial
release.
Sec. 3. Section 71-5665, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5665 The commission shall periodically designate health
profession shortage areas within the state for the following professions:
-4-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
Medicine and surgery, psychiatry, physician assistants' practice, nurse
practitioners' practice, dietitian nutritionist practice, psychology, and
mental health practitioners' practice. The commission shall also
periodically designate separate health profession shortage areas for each
of the following professions: Pharmacy, dentistry, physical therapy, and
occupational therapy. In making such designations the commission shall
consider, after consultation with other appropriate agencies concerned
with health services and with appropriate professional organizations,
among other factors:
(1) The latest reliable statistical data available regarding the
number of health professionals practicing in an area and the population
to be served by such practitioners;
(2) Inaccessibility of health care services to residents of an area;
(3) Particular local health problems;
(4) Age or incapacity of local practitioners rendering services; and
(5) Demographic trends in an area both past and future.
Sec. 4. Section 71-5668, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5668 Each loan repayment recipient shall execute an agreement
with the department and a local entity. Such agreement shall be exempt
from the requirements of the State Procurement Act and shall include, at
a minimum, the following terms:
(1) The loan repayment recipient agrees to practice his or her
profession, and a physician, psychiatrist, dentist, nurse practitioner,
dietitian nutritionist, or physician assistant also agrees to practice an
approved specialty, in a designated health profession shortage area for
at least three years, or the period required by subdivision (4)(c) of
section 71-5663, and to accept medicaid patients in his or her practice;
(2) In consideration of the agreement by the recipient, the State of
Nebraska and a local entity within the designated health profession
shortage area will provide equal funding for the repayment of the
-5-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
recipient's qualified educational debts except as provided in subdivision
(5) of this section, in amounts up to thirty thousand dollars per year
per recipient for physicians, psychiatrists, dentists, and psychologists
and up to fifteen thousand dollars per year per recipient for physician
assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, physical therapists,
occupational therapists, dietitian nutritionists, and mental health
practitioners toward qualified educational debts for up to three years or
a longer period as required by subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663. The
department shall make payments directly to the recipient;
(3) If the loan repayment recipient discontinues practice in the
shortage area prior to completion of the three-year requirement or the
period required by subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, as applicable,
the recipient shall repay to the state one hundred fifty percent of the
total amount of funds provided to the recipient for loan repayment with
interest at a rate of eight percent simple interest per year from the
date of default. Upon repayment by the recipient to the department, the
department shall reimburse the local entity its share of the funds which
shall not be more than the local entity's share paid to the loan
repayment recipient;
(4) Any practice or payment obligation incurred by the loan
repayment recipient under the loan repayment program is canceled in the
event of the loan repayment recipient's total and permanent disability or
death;
(5) For a loan repayment recipient seeking benefits under
subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, the recipient agrees to such other
terms as the department deems appropriate; and
(6) Beginning on July 1, 2022, any agreements entered into by
December 31, 2024, shall first use federal funds from the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 for the purposes of repaying qualified
educational debts prior to using any state or local funds. Agreements
using federal funds from the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
-6-

LB553 LB553
2025 2025
shall not require equal funding from a local entity. Any federal funds
from the act committed to agreements during this time period shall be
used by December 31, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 71-5662, 71-5663, 71-5665, and 71-5668,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-